Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 1. Administration and Management.

Sec. 41.17.010.
Declaration of intent.

The legislature declares that

the forest resources of Alaska are among the most valuable natural resources of the state, and furnish timber and wood products, fish and wildlife, tourism, outdoor recreation, water, soil, air, minerals, and general health and welfare;

economic enterprises and other activities and pursuits derived from forest resources warrant the continuing recognition and support of the state;

the state has a fundamental obligation to ensure that management of forest resources guarantees perpetual supplies of renewable resources, provides nonrenewable resources in a manner consistent with that obligation, and serves the needs of all Alaska for the many products, benefits, and services obtained from them;

government administration of forest resources should combine professional management services, regulatory measures, and economic incentives in a complementary fashion, and should draw upon the expertise of professional foresters in conjunction with other disciplines;

under the leadership of the Department of Environmental Conservation as lead agency, the state should exercise its full responsibility and authority for control of nonpoint source pollution with respect to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended;

subject to AS

41.17.098(c)

, the provisions of this chapter, and regulations adopted under this chapter, with the approval of the Department of Environmental Conservation, establish the nonpoint source pollution requirements under state law and sec. 319 of the Clean Water Act for activities subject to this chapter;

except for activities subject to AS

16.05.841

or

16.05.871

and regulations authorized by those sections, this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter establish the fish habitat protection standards, policies, and review processes under state law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 107, § 6 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 § 7 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.

For road construction, see 11 AAC 95, art. 3.

For timber harvesting, see 11 AAC 95, art. 4.

For reforestation, see 11 AAC 95, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The allocation of responsibility for administration of the forest practices regulations in coastal management consistency determinations is sufficiently unclear that it seems appropriate for resolution by the adoption of regulations since differing policy considerations emphasized in the Forest Practices Act, the Coastal Management Act, and proposed permit reform regulations will be served to a greater or lesser extent by assigning responsibility for interpreting and applying the forest practices regulations to more than one agency and since a particular result is not compelled under the various pieces of authorizing legislation.
April 20, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

The adoption of forest practices regulations by the Department of Natural Resources in 11 AAC 95 has completely preempted the coastal policy council’s regulations,
6 AAC 80.100, in regulating timber harvest and processing in the coastal area. April 20, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 41.17.020.
Division of forestry established.

The governor may establish, within the department, a division of forestry to carry out this chapter and other appropriate duties designated by the governor.

The division shall be headed by a director who shall be the state forester, appointed to the partially exempt service in accordance with law by the commissioner, from a list of two or more candidates submitted by the board. The commissioner shall solicit and consider recommendations of the Alaska Fire Chiefs Association or successor organization when reviewing the candidates submitted by the board. The commissioner may reject all candidates, in which case the board shall submit a new list. The state forester shall have

a bachelor’s or higher degree in forest management and at least three years of field experience in forestry; or

at least eight years of professional work experience as a forester.

The commissioner shall administer this chapter and is authorized and encouraged to delegate responsibilities for carrying out this chapter to the state forester.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 42 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 91 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1983, this section was reorganized into present subsections (a)-(c) and two other sections.
Present (b) was formerly part of (a) and present (c) was formerly designated (b). Former subsections (d)-(i) and (k) were renumbered as AS

41.17.055(a)

-(g) and former subsection (j) was renumbered as AS

41.17.900(d)

.

Administrative Code. —

For forest fire protection, see 11 AAC 95, art. 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The allocation of responsibility for administration of the forest practices regulations in coastal management consistency determinations is sufficiently unclear that it seems appropriate for resolution by the adoption of regulations. Differing policy considerations emphasized in the Forest Practices Act, the Coastal Management Act, and proposed permit reform regulations will be served to a greater or lesser extent by assigning responsibility for interpreting and applying the forest practices regulations to more than one agency. This is especially so as no particular result is compelled under the various pieces of authorizing legislation.
April 20, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

The adoption of forest practices regulations by the Department of Natural Resources in 11 AAC 95 has completely preempted the coastal policy council’s regulations,
6 AAC 80.100, in regulating timber harvest and processing in the coastal area. April 20, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 41.17.030.
Responsibilities of division.

The division shall manage state forests and, as directed by the commissioner, provide technical advice to the division of lands on sound forest practices necessary to ensure the continuous growing and harvesting of commercial forest species on other state land.

The division shall regulate operations on private forest land as authorized by the provisions of this chapter or state law.

The division shall provide public information and assistance regarding forest practices and timber management generally.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978)

Sec. 41.17.041.
Board of Forestry.

The Board of Forestry is established in the division.

The board is composed of nine members appointed by the governor:

a representative of a commercial fishermen’s organization;

a representative of a Native corporation established under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act);

a representative of an environmental organization;

a representative of a forest industry trade association;

a professional fish or wildlife biologist who is not employed in that capacity by a state, municipal, or federal government agency, except for university employment;

a professional forester who is not employed in that capacity by a state, municipal, or federal government agency, except for university employment;

a representative of a mining organization;

a representative of a recreational organization; and

the state forester, who serves ex officio and without a vote.

The state forester is the presiding officer of the board and shall, in consultation with the board, establish procedures for scheduling and organizing board meetings. Seven voting members of the board constitute a quorum. Each decision of the board requires the affirmative vote of each voting member present less one.

A board member who is unable to attend a meeting may designate an alternate who possesses the same qualifications as the board member.

The division shall serve as staff to the board. The department, the Department of Fish and Game, and the Department of Environmental Conservation shall provide technical staffing and information as needed by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 87 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 34 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 107, § 7 (2003); am § 47 ch 56 SLA 2005; am E.O. No. 114 § 8 (2008))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.17.040(a)-(d), (g).
Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.17.043.
Terms of office.

The term of office of a member of the board is three years. The state forester serves an indefinite term, ex officio.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 32 ch 85 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.17.040(e). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.17.045.
Removal of members.

The governor may initiate the removal of a board member for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office by delivering to the member a written copy of the charges and giving the member an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel at a public hearing before the governor or the governor’s designee on at least 10 days’ written notice by registered mail. The member has a right of confrontation and cross-examination of witnesses testifying.

The removal is effective 15 days after the governor files a complete statement of all charges made against the member and the findings on those charges, in the main office of the board, except that a member may appeal the findings to the superior court. The court shall limit its review to a determination of whether the findings on the charges are substantiated by the evidence presented. The removal is suspended for any period of time during which an appeal from the findings of the governor or the governor’s designee is pending.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.17.040(h). Renumbered and reorganized into two subsections in 1983.

Sec. 41.17.047.
Powers and duties of board.

The board shall review and comment to the commissioner on regulations proposed for adoption under this chapter.

The board shall provide a forum for representatives of affected interests to discuss and attempt to resolve issues relevant to this chapter and to the forest resources of the state.

The board, working with the department, the Department of Environmental Conservation, the Department of Fish and Game, other affected agencies and parties, and the forest-dependent industries, shall conduct an annual survey of research needs related to forest practices. The board shall review research proposals and shall make recommendations to promote research projects that would address these needs to the governor and the legislature.

The board shall coordinate the monitoring of the implementation and effectiveness of this chapter, the regulations, and best management practices adopted under this chapter in meeting state water quality standards, fish and wildlife habitat requirements, and other forestry objectives. The board shall report annually to the governor on the effectiveness of this chapter and regulations adopted under it, with its recommendations for changes and for needed research and monitoring. The board shall notify the legislature that the annual report is available. The state forester, the Department of Fish and Game, and the Department of Environmental Conservation shall each present an annual report, independently, to the board on the effectiveness of this chapter, the regulations, and best management practices adopted under this chapter that protect the resources for which they have statutory responsibility, and shall make recommendations for changes to correct procedural or substantive problems. The board shall include the reports as part of its annual report. The board shall hold hearings at least once annually in southeast, southcentral, and interior Alaska for purposes of taking public testimony on the subjects.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 34 SLA 1990; am § 75 ch 21 SLA 1995; am E.O. No. 107, §§ 8, 9 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 §§ 9, 10 (2008))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.17.040(f). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.17.055.
Powers and duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner may designate and operate experimental and research forests on state land consistent with the limitations of AS

38.05.300

. Laboratories and other facilities may be employed in conjunction with those forests.

The commissioner may establish and maintain forest vegetation nurseries and greenhouses for planting stock to be made available, with or without charge, to organizations, institutions, government agencies, individuals, and businesses for reforestation, afforestation, and related purposes.

The commissioner is authorized to undertake cooperative forestry programs, extension services, and education programs, and to otherwise offer a full range of professional management services to the interested public. When the commissioner considers it beneficial, the commissioner may participate in federal assistance programs by accepting assistance in whatever form offered.

The commissioner may develop regulations under this chapter as part of the state program for control of nonpoint source pollution under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended. However, the Department of Environmental Conservation is the lead agency for water quality and control of nonpoint source pollution under that Act, and the regulations are therefore subject to the approval of the commissioner of environmental conservation.

In the administration of this chapter, the commissioner shall consult with and draw upon the expertise of interested organizations, enterprises, individuals, government agencies, educational institutions, and landowners. The commissioner may enter into cooperative agreements and contracts with them to carry out this chapter.

The commissioner shall locate department personnel with forestry expertise throughout the state to facilitate public access to professional management services and other forest resources programs.

The commissioner may take other actions necessary and proper for the administration of this chapter, including the adoption of regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) and AS

41.17.047

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 34 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 107, § 10 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 § 11 (2008))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.17.020(d)-(i), (k).
Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to the 2003 transfer of responsibility for stream preservation and forest stewardship from the commissioner of natural resources to the state forester, see § 46, E.O. 107, in the Executive Orders pamphlet. For transitional provisions relating to the 2008 transfer of responsibility for stream preservation and forest stewardship from the state forester to the commissioner of natural resources, see § 40, E.O. 114, in the Executive Orders pamphlet.

For the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, referred to in subsection (d), see 33 U.S.C. ch. 26.

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.

For road construction, see 11 AAC 95, art. 3.

For timber harvesting, see 11 AAC 95, art. 4.

For reforestation, see 11 AAC 95, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The adoption of forest practices regulations by the Department of Natural Resources in 11 AAC 95 has completely preempted the coastal policy council’s regulations,
6 AAC 80.100, in regulating timber harvest and processing in the coastal area. April 20, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 41.17.060.
Regulatory and administrative standards.

All regulations, administrative actions, and other activities and duties undertaken under this chapter shall be in full accordance with the standards set out in this section.

With respect to state, municipal, and private forest land, the following standards apply:

to the maximum extent possible, all applicable data and information of applicable disciplines shall be updated and used in making decisions relative to the management of forest resources;

environmentally sensitive areas shall be recognized in the development of regulations and best management practices that are designed to implement nonpoint source pollution control measures authorized under this chapter;

administration of forest land shall consider marketing conditions and other economic constraints affecting the forest landowner, timber owner, or the operator;

to the fullest extent practicable, harvested forest land shall be reforested, naturally or artificially, so as to result in a sustained yield of merchantable timber from that land; if artificial planting is required, silviculturally acceptable seedlings must first be available for planting at an economically fair price in the state; and

significant adverse effects of soil erosion and mass wasting on water quality and fish habitat shall be prevented or minimized.

With respect to state and municipal forest land only, the following standards also apply:

forest land shall be administered for the multiple use of the renewable and nonrenewable resources and for the sustained yield of the renewable resources of the land in the manner that best provides for the present needs and preserves the future options of the people of the state;

a system of allocating predominant uses or values to particular units within a contiguous area of land shall reflect in reasonable proportion the various resources and values present in that area;

to the extent its capacity permits, forest land shall be administered so as to provide for the continuation of businesses, activities, and lifestyles that are dependent upon or derived from forest resources;

timber harvesting is limited to areas where data and information demonstrate that natural or artificial reforestation techniques will result in the production of a sustained yield of merchantable timber from that area;

there may not be significant impairment of the productivity of the land and water with respect to renewable resources;

allowance shall be made for scenic quality in or adjacent to areas of substantial importance to the tourism and recreation industry; and

allowance shall be made for important fish and wildlife habitat.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am §§ 6, 7 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For reforestation, see 11 AAC 95, art. 5.

Sec. 41.17.070.
Administrative plan and report.

The commissioner shall develop and continually maintain a long-range plan for the administration of this chapter that demonstrates that the provisions of AS

41.17.010

are being recognized and that the standards of AS

41.17.060

are being met. The commissioner shall maintain a current inventory or assessment of timber on forest land to assist in meeting the requirements of this section.

To maintain a record of division decision making for public and agency review, the commissioner shall compile and index each decision made under this chapter regarding directives, stop work orders, waivers from requirements, decisions of hearing officers, and decisions on appeals. The commissioner shall submit a summary of this record annually to the board.

[Repealed, § 108 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

[Repealed, § 108 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 108 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 34 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 107, §§ 11, 12 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 §§ 12, 13 (2008))

Sec. 41.17.080.
Regulations.

The commissioner may adopt regulations necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) regarding forest practices such as

road construction and maintenance, including

road location, construction, maintenance, and post-operation management or removal;

landing location and construction;

drainage structures;

material sources and spoil disposal sites;

timber harvesting, including

timber harvest unit planning and design;

felling and bucking;

cable yarding, shovel, tractor, and wheeled skidder systems;

landing clean-up;

slash disposal;

log transfer, sort yards, and storage facilities, including

location, design, and construction;

maintenance;

closure;

log storage, rafting, and identification;

reforestation, including

site preparation and rehabilitation;

prescribed burning;

exemptions from reforestation requirements;

prevention and suppression of forest insects and diseases;

salvage logging;

vegetative management; and

fire and flood hazard management.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations specifying the information to be submitted under AS

41.17.090(c)

in the detailed plan of operations to enable the division to determine whether the activities comply with the requirements of this chapter.

The commissioner may establish regions, districts, or other subdivisions of forest land in the state in which different regulations apply to reflect varying conditions in the state or to facilitate administration. In adopting regulations, the commissioner shall make appropriate distinctions between public and private land.

The commissioner shall adopt only those regulations necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter and shall avoid regulations that increase operating costs without yielding significant benefits to public resources.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 34 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 107, § 13 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 § 14 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.

For road construction, see 11 AAC 95, art. 3.

For timber harvesting, see 11 AAC 95, art. 4.

For reforestation, see 11 AAC 95, art. 5.

For forest fire protection, see 11 AAC 95, art. 6.

Sec. 41.17.081.
Civil immunity.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, a person may not bring a civil action for damages for death, personal injury, or property damage that results from an act or omission in performing or failing to perform activities or duties arising out of prevention, monitoring, control, or suppression of fires authorized to be performed under regulations adopted under AS

41.17.080(a)(8)

against

the state or its officers, agents, and employees;

a political subdivision of the state or its officers, agents, and employees;

any organization authorized to prevent, control, or suppress fires; or

others assisting in the control or suppression of fires at the request of an officer or employee of the United States or the state.

This section does not apply to a civil action for damages as a result of intentional misconduct within the course and scope of employment or agency and with complete disregard for the safety and property of others.

History.

(§ 12 ch 43 SLA 2003)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2003 (HB 245), which added this section, see 2003 House Journal 777—783.

Sec. 41.17.082.
Control of infestations and disease.

All forest clearing operations and silvicultural systems shall be designed to reduce the likelihood of increased insect infestation and disease infections that threaten forest resources.

A forest landowner may not conduct or approve timber clearing activities that create conditions fostering outbreaks of infestation or infection that threaten forest resources on forest land belonging to another person. If the commissioner finds, after notice and hearing, that there has been a violation of this subsection, the commissioner may require the forest landowner, at that person’s expense, to

remove promptly or cure the conditions fostering outbreaks of infestation or infection; and

undertake environmentally sound, effective, and cost-efficient actions to control the infestation or infection in the immediate vicinity of the improper timber clearing activity.

If a forest landowner does not comply with a final order of the commissioner under (b)(1) or (b)(2) of this section, the commissioner may enter onto the land and undertake the actions ordered and the landowner is liable for the cost of the actions. The commissioner shall deliver to the landowner an itemized statement of expenses incurred.

The commissioner may undertake surveys and appraisals to obtain data on regional insect infestations and disease conditions. Upon a determination that an area is infested with forest insects or infected with diseases injurious to forest resources and that the infestation or infection threatens the forest land or timber of adjacent owners, the commissioner may establish the boundaries of an infestation or infection zone. The commissioner may enter into an agreement with an owner or with a governmental agency to control or suppress infestation or infection within the zone. Upon a determination by the commissioner that insect and disease control work within the zone is no longer necessary or feasible, the commissioner shall terminate the zone.

History.

(§ 10 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

Sec. 41.17.083.
Clearing of forest land for non-timber purposes.

A state agency, municipality, or public utility shall determine whether the timber to be removed has significant salvage value before approving or conducting clearing of forest land for purposes other than timber harvest.
If the timber has significant salvage value, the agency or utility shall salvage the timber as part of the clearing process.

History.

(§ 10 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Sec. 41.17.085.
Permit applications.

[Repealed, § 4, ch 23 SLA 2003.]

Where practicable and desirable, the commissioner may enter into cooperative agreements with federal agencies authorizing the department to serve as a collection point for federal permit applications.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 23 SLA 2003; am E.O. No. 107, § 14 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

41.17.080(b)

. Renumbered and reorganized in 1983.

Sec. 41.17.087.
Variation from requirements.

A forest landowner, timber owner, or operator may propose for a particular activity a variation from a requirement imposed by this chapter or the regulations adopted under this chapter. If the state forester determines that the harm intended to be avoided by the requirement is not likely to occur because of site-specific circumstances relating to the particular activity and is not likely to cause significant harm to fish habitat or water quality, the state forester shall agree to the proposed variation. If the state forester does not agree to the proposed variation, a forest landowner, timber owner, or operator may appeal to the commissioner. The appellants shall conform to the requirement during the pendency of the appeal.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations that specify the standards under which a variation will be granted for harvesting timber within the riparian area of

a low gradient Type I-A water body with a width of five feet or less; and

other appropriate water body types.

A determination by the state forester under (a) of this section and regulations by the commissioner under (b) of this section shall give due deference under AS

41.17.098

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 34 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 2003; am E.O. No. 107, §§ 15, 16 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 §§ 15, 16 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

For riparian standards, see 11 AAC 95, art. 2.

Sec. 41.17.090.
Notification of plans to harvest timber.

Operations on forest land shall be reviewed under this section for consistency with the policies and provisions of this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter.

A forest landowner, timber owner, or operator may provide to the commissioner a voluntary plan of operations that describes the long-term plans for timber harvesting. The purpose of a voluntary plan is to give the division and the public an early opportunity to review plans, to identify areas of concern, and to allow the agencies and the public to provide local knowledge and early notice of potential problems to the forest landowner, timber owner, or operator.

Before beginning operations on municipal or private forest land or on state land not managed by the division, the operator shall provide the state forester with a detailed plan of operations. The detailed plan of operations must include

a description of the proposed operations, identifying the land involved and the action proposed in sufficient detail to inform the public of the nature and location of the proposed operations; the description must include a map and must be in a form suitable for duplication;

the name, address, and approving signature of the forest landowner, timber owner, and operator; and

other information required in the regulations adopted under this chapter.

Within five days after receipt of a detailed plan of operations under (c) of this section, the state forester shall distribute the information received under (c) of this section to affected state agencies and coastal districts, and shall distribute the information received under (c)(1) of this section to each member of the public who has asked to receive copies of notifications for the affected area.

Within 30 days after receipt of a detailed plan of operations, the state forester shall review the plan to determine if the operations are consistent with this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter. Operations may begin under the plan upon the expiration of the 30-day period or upon notice from the state forester that the review has been completed, whichever occurs first, unless the division has issued a stop work order for a particular portion of the plan or has notified the operator that a one-time, 10-day extension is necessary for agency review under AS

41.17.098(f)

. The operator may proceed with operations not covered by the stop work order, notice of field inspection, or the agency review. During the review of a detailed plan of operations, if a question arises concerning the proper classification of water body type for purposes of the standards in AS

41.17.116(a)

, the Department of Fish and Game may resolve the question.

If the state forester determines that a field inspection is necessary to determine consistency of the detailed plan of operations or a portion of the plan with applicable standards, the state forester shall notify the operator. The notice of field inspection may not cover more than the minimum area necessary to determine compliance with this chapter and applicable regulations. The operator shall inform the state forester when the site will be available for an inspection. The state forester shall conduct the field inspection within 21 days after the date that the site will be accessible and available unless the operator otherwise agrees, and the operator may begin operations at the conclusion of the 21-day period unless the state forester has issued a stop work order under AS

41.17.138

.

During the review of a detailed plan of operations, modifications to accommodate comments may be made without requiring the operator to resubmit the plan. After the review of the detailed plan of operations made under (e) and (f) of this section, an operator shall notify the state forester of a proposed substantial change in operations by following the procedures specified in (c) — (f) of this section.

Information and paperwork required of the operator under this section is limited to that necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

An operator shall renew a detailed plan of operations annually.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 109 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 34 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 122 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 107, §§ 17 — 19 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 §§ 17 — 19 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

Sec. 41.17.098.
Interagency coordination and reevaluation.

In administering this chapter, the commissioner shall coordinate with other agencies and affected coastal districts that have jurisdiction over activities subject to regulation under this chapter.

In a review or implementation of a detailed plan of operations under AS

41.17.090

and in a decision on a proposed variation from requirements under AS

41.17.087

, the commissioner shall consider the comments of each affected state agency and, where applicable, coastal districts.

The commissioner shall give due deference to the Department of Environmental Conservation in decisions concerning water quality. The commissioner of environmental conservation retains the authority to adopt nonpoint source pollution regulations for activities subject to this chapter to the extent that regulations are not adopted by the commissioner of natural resources and approved by the commissioner of environmental conservation under this chapter. The commissioner of environmental conservation may withdraw approval of regulations adopted by the commissioner of natural resources under this chapter by following the procedure for the adoption, amendment, and repeal of regulations under AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

.

The commissioner shall recognize the expertise of the Department of Fish and Game with regard to fish and wildlife habitat. On private land, the commissioner shall give due deference to the Department of Fish and Game regarding effects on fish habitat from timber operations including variations to riparian standards, designation of alternative site-specific riparian protection plans, and road location decisions within riparian areas. On public land, the commissioner shall give due deference to the Department of Fish and Game regarding effects on fish and wildlife habitat from timber operations including timber harvest in riparian areas, variations to riparian standards, and road location decisions within riparian areas. In making decisions under AS

41.17.087

, the commissioner shall recognize fish habitat as the primary value in riparian areas.

In this section, “due deference” means that deference that is appropriate in the context of the agency’s expertise and area of responsibility and all the evidence available to support a factual assertion. Where due deference is given, if the commissioner does not agree with a commenting agency, the commissioner shall prepare a written statement of the reasons for the disagreement.

If a disagreement described in (e) of this section exists, an officer of an agency may require reevaluation of the disagreement at a higher level within the agencies, or by the governor if necessary, before a decision is made by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 13 ch 34 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 107, §§ 20 — 24 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 §§ 20 — 24 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

For road construction, see 11 AAC 95, art. 3.

For timber harvesting, see 11 AAC 95, art. 4.

Sec. 41.17.100.
Deployment of broadcast chemicals.

The commissioner of environmental conservation, in consultation with the commissioner, shall formulate necessary plans and measures to ensure that application of broadcast chemicals and other substances foreign to the state’s forest ecosystem do not lead to results contrary to the objectives and provisions of this chapter and other applicable laws and regulations relating to renewable resources. Regulations adopted by the commissioner of environmental conservation may include requirements for advance testing, posting of security, written reports, and other matters.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 3.

For permit requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 5.

For forestry vegetation management, see 18 AAC 90, art. 8.

Sec. 41.17.110.
Conversion of forest land to other uses.

An intention to convert forest land to other uses after timber harvesting may be stated in the notification submitted under AS

41.17.090

. In that event, reforestation requirements adopted under this chapter do not apply, except that conversion shall be completed during the time set by regulation for minimum reforestation of the land, and other requirements for revegetation may be imposed to the extent permitted by law. If the commissioner finds at any time that the responsible party has failed to conform to the intent to convert as stated in the notification, the commissioner shall revoke approval of the conversion and require full compliance with reforestation requirements.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 107, § 25 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 § 25 (2008))